Illinois, session 104th, HB2411.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Tiny 5Homes Act. 6    Section 5. Findings. The General Assembly finds that:7        (1) there is a serious housing shortage in this State;8        (2) rising costs in the building construction field 9    have seriously impeded the building of new housing, 10    particularly for moderate-income and low-income citizens;11        (3) the existing housing stock is continuously 12    depleted through demolition resulting from aging 13    buildings, urban renewal, highway construction, and other 14    necessary public improvements;15        (4) advances in the construction of tiny homes have 16    significantly increased the importance of this mode of 17    housing; and18        (5) through proper regulation and licensing, tiny 19    homes can contribute to the provision of quality housing 20    for Illinois citizens. 21    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:22    "Administrative decision" has the meaning given in Section   HB2411- 2 -LRB104 09765 LNS 19831 b13-101 of the Code of Civil Procedure.2    "Applicable tiny home park fire protection standards" 3means: (i) in the case of a home rule unit, the fire protection 4standards ordinance of the municipality or fire protection 5district that has jurisdictional responsibility for responding 6to a fire call in that tiny home park; or (ii) if there is no 7ordinance or in the case of a non-home rule unit, the rules 8adopted by the Office of the State Fire Marshal for fire safety 9in tiny home parks.10    "Authority" means the Illinois Housing Development 11Authority.12    "Director" means the Executive Director of the Authority.13    "Independent tiny home" means a tiny home which has (i) a 14self-contained toilet and (ii) bath or shower facilities.15    "Maintain or operate a tiny home park" includes, but is 16not limited to, supplying or maintaining common water, sewer, 17or other utility supply or service, or the collection of rent 18directly or indirectly from 10 or more independent tiny homes.19    "Permanent habitation" means habitation for a period of 6 20or more months.21    "Site" means the lot on which the tiny home is located for 22permanent habitation.23    "Tiny home" means a factory-assembled, completely 24integrated structure that: (i) is designed for permanent 25habitation; (ii) is permanently constructed on a vehicle 26chassis; (iii) includes electrical, mechanical, or plumbing   HB2411- 3 -LRB104 09765 LNS 19831 b1services that are fabricated, formed, or assembled at a 2location other than the site of the completed home; (iv) is not 3self-propelled; (v) has a square footage of 1,000 square feet 4or less; (vi) has a metal plate insignia installed under the 5kitchen sink by the Authority; (vii) is connected to utilities 6for year-round occupancy for use as a permanent habitation; 7and (viii) is designed and situated to permit its occupancy as 8a dwelling place for one or more persons. "Tiny home" does not 9include a camper or recreational vehicle or a mobile home or 10manufactured home, as defined under Section 2.1 of the Mobile 11Home Park Act.12    "Tiny home park" means a tract of land or 2 or more 13contiguous tracts of land upon which there are sites with the 14necessary utilities for 10 or more independent tiny homes for 15permanent habitation. "Tiny home park" includes any building, 16structure, vehicle, or enclosure used or intended for use as a 17part of the equipment of the tiny home park. Separate 18ownership of contiguous tracts of land shall not preclude the 19tracts of land from common licensure as a tiny home park if 20they are maintained and operated jointly. "Tiny home park" 21does not include an immobilized mobile home or a motorized 22recreational vehicle. 23    Section 15. License to operate tiny home park required. No 24person, firm, or corporation shall establish, maintain, or 25operate a tiny home park without a license from the Authority.   HB2411- 4 -LRB104 09765 LNS 19831 b1The license shall expire December 31 of each year, and a new 2license shall be issued upon proper application and payment of 3the annual license fee if the applicant is in substantial 4compliance with the rules of the Authority. 5    Section 20. Tiny home park permit application 6requirements. In order to obtain a permit to construct a new 7tiny home park, the applicant shall file with the Authority a 8written application and plan documents, including the 9following:10        (1) The full name and address of the applicant or 11    applicants, or names and addresses of the partners if the 12    applicant is a partnership, the names and addresses of the 13    officers if the applicant is a corporation, the names and 14    addresses of the manager if the applicant is a limited 15    liability company, or the name of the trustee if the 16    applicant is a trust.17        (2) The address, location, and legal description of 18    the tract of land upon which it is proposed to construct, 19    operate, and maintain a tiny home park.20        (3) The name of the tiny home park.21        (4) Detailed plans and specifications sealed by a 22    registered engineer or architect licensed to practice in 23    the State, which include a general plot plan of the tiny 24    home park with all sites and structures shown, the water 25    supply system, the sewage disposal system, the electrical   HB2411- 5 -LRB104 09765 LNS 19831 b1    system, the fuel supply system, the lighting system, the 2    method of disposal of solid waste, all streets and 3    sidewalks, swimming and bathing facilities, pickleball 4    courts, fire hydrants, and details of all auxiliary 5    structures.6        (5) The number of tiny home sites proposed to be 7    constructed or licensed.8        (6) A statement of the firefighting facilities, public 9    or private, that are available to the tiny home park.10        (7) A plan review fee in the amount of $500, which is 11    nonrefundable. 12    Section 25. Issuance of permits. Upon receipt of an 13application for a permit to construct or alter a tiny home park 14or an application for an original license to maintain and 15operate a tiny home park, the Authority shall, if the tiny home 16park is, or the proposed tiny home park will be, in conformity 17with this Act and the rules adopted by the Authority under this 18Act, issue a permit to construct or an original license. If the 19application for a permit to construct or an original license 20is declined, the Authority shall give the reasons for its 21decision in writing to the applicant, and if the objections 22can be corrected, the applicant may amend the application and 23resubmit it for approval.24    If a permit to construct a tiny home park has been issued, 25the applicant shall notify the Authority of the completion of   HB2411- 6 -LRB104 09765 LNS 19831 b1the tiny home park. The Authority shall then inspect the tiny 2home park and, if completed in accordance with the approved 3plans, shall issue a license for the number of approved sites 4after receipt of the required fee.5    Within 10 days of receiving an application for a permit to 6construct a tiny home park or alter a licensed tiny home park, 7the Authority shall send a copy of the application, by 8certified mail, to the county or municipality in which the 9proposed or existing tiny home park is located. Construction 10for which the Authority has issued a permit shall not commence 11until the applicant has received any required municipal or 12county building and zoning approvals. No license to maintain 13and operate a tiny home park shall be issued by Authority if 14the Authority is notified, within 60 days of the mailing of the 15application to the municipality or county, by a written 16certification from the municipal or county zoning board or 17commission of any municipality or county that the tiny home 18park is in violation of any municipal or county zoning or other 19ordinances. Upon certification from the municipal or county 20zoning board that the tiny home park has complied with the 21municipal or county zoning or other ordinances and other 22requirements of this Act have been met, the license shall be 23issued. Within 10 days after the tiny home park has complied 24with the municipal or county zoning ordinance, the municipal 25or county zoning board or commission shall certify compliance 26to the Authority. Fees charged by the municipality or county   HB2411- 7 -LRB104 09765 LNS 19831 b1for permits shall not exceed the usual charge for the services 2provided by the municipality or county in connection with the 3permits. 4    Section 30. License fees. In addition to the application 5fees provided for under this Act, the tiny home park operator 6shall pay to the Authority on or before December 31 of each 7year, an annual license fee. The annual license fee shall be 8$500 plus $50 for each tiny home site in the tiny home park. 9Each license fee shall be paid to the Authority and any license 10fee or any part of the license fee, once paid to and accepted 11by the Authority, shall not be refunded.12    The Authority shall deposit all funds received under this 13Act into the Facility Licensing Fund. Subject to 14appropriation, moneys in the Fund shall be used for the 15enforcement of this Act. 16    Section 35. Revocation or suspension of license. Any 17license granted under this Act shall be subject to revocation 18or suspension by the Authority. However, the Authority shall 19first serve or cause to be served upon the tiny home park 20operator a written notice in which shall be specified the way 21or ways in which the tiny home park operator has failed to 22comply with this Act or any rules adopted by the Authority 23under this Act. The notice shall require the tiny home park 24operator to remove or abate the nuisance, insanitary, or   HB2411- 8 -LRB104 09765 LNS 19831 b1objectionable condition, specified in the notice, within 5 2days or within a longer period of time as may be allowed by the 3Authority. If the tiny home park operator fails to comply with 4the terms and conditions of the notice, within the time 5specified or an extended period of time, the Authority may 6revoke or suspend the tiny home park operator's license. 7    Section 40. Permit required to construct tiny home park. 8No person, firm, corporation, limited liability company, 9trust, or other business entity shall construct a tiny home 10park without first obtaining a permit to do so. All permits to 11construct and all licenses to operate shall be prominently 12displayed in the tiny home park office. All licenses issued 13under this Act shall be transferable only with the written 14consent of the Authority; however, the Authority may not 15withhold consent where the provisions of this Act have been 16met. The tiny home park operator shall provide to the 17Authority the information required in paragraphs (1), (3), and 18(5) of Section 20. 19    Section 45. Operation and maintenance of tiny home park. 20Each tiny home park licensed or to be constructed under the 21provisions of this Act shall be operated and maintained in 22accordance with the requirements of Sections 50 through 110. 23    Section 50. Management by responsible individual. Every   HB2411- 9 -LRB104 09765 LNS 19831 b1tiny home park shall be managed by a responsible individual 2whose name, address, and telephone number shall be on file at 3all times with the Authority and whose duty it shall be to 4maintain the tiny home park, its facilities, and equipment in 5a clean, orderly, and sanitary condition, and that individual 6shall be responsible, with the tiny home park operator, for 7any violation of the provisions of this Act. 8    Section 55. Drainage and water supply. No tiny home park 9shall be located in a manner that causes the drainage of the 10tiny home park to endanger a water supply. All tiny home parks 11shall be well drained. No wastewater shall be deposited on the 12surface of the ground within the tiny home park. 13    Section 60. Tiny home size. Each site on which a tiny home 14is accommodated shall have a minimum area of 1,000 square 15feet.16    No tiny home shall be parked closer than 50 feet to the 17side lot lines of a tiny home park, or closer than 50 feet to a 18public street, alley, or building. Each individual site shall 19abut or face on a private or public street. All streets shall 20have unobstructed access to a public street. There shall be an 21open space of at least 50 feet next to the sides of every tiny 22home and an open space of at least 50 feet next to the ends of 23every tiny home.   HB2411- 10 -LRB104 09765 LNS 19831 b1    Section 65. Safe and sanitary water. An adequate supply of 2water of safe, sanitary quality, approved by the Authority, 3shall be furnished at each tiny home park. If water from other 4sources than that supplied by a city or village is proposed to 5be used, the source of the supply shall first be approved by 6the Authority. Each tiny home shall have a connection to a 7public water system, a semi-private water system, or a private 8water supply constructed in accordance with the requirements 9of the Illinois Water Well Construction Code or the Surface 10Source Water Treatment Code. 11    Section 70. Sewage disposal. All sewage and other water 12carried wastes shall be disposed of into a municipal sewerage 13system whenever the interceptor or sewer main of the system is 14next to the tiny home park. In a tiny home park in which the 15connections are not available, disposal shall be into a 16private system which includes a sanitary means of disposal, 17the operation of which creates neither a nuisance nor a menace 18to health. 19    Section 75. Garbage. A sufficient number of adequate 20flyproof and watertight containers in accordance with rules 21adopted by the Authority shall be supplied for the storage of 22garbage except where an adequate incinerator is provided.23    Garbage containers shall be emptied at least once a week 24and shall not be filled to overflowing or allowed to become   HB2411- 11 -LRB104 09765 LNS 19831 b1foul smelling or a breeding place for flies.2    Garbage and rubbish shall be disposed of in a that creates 3neither a nuisance nor a menace to health and in a manner that 4is approved by the Authority. 5    Section 80. Insect and rodent control. Adequate insect and 6rodent control measures shall be employed. All buildings shall 7be fly proof and rodent proof, and rodent harborages shall not 8be permitted to exist in the tiny home park or pathways. All 9tiny homes shall be skirted to exclude rodents and provide 10protection to the homes' utilities from the weather. 11    Section 85. Fire extinguishers required. Each tiny home in 12a tiny home park shall be equipped with fire extinguishers in 13working order, one in each end of the tiny home.14    Inspection of any equipment and enforcement of any rules 15adopted under this Act shall be the duty of the State Fire 16Marshal and local law enforcement agencies in the county or 17municipality where the tiny home park is located. 18    Section 90. Construction of auxiliary rooms. Porches, 19carports, garages, sheds, awnings, skirting, and auxiliary 20rooms shall be constructed of materials specified by rule. 21    Section 95. Street maintenance. All streets in every tiny 22home park must be maintained in a passable and reasonably   HB2411- 12 -LRB104 09765 LNS 19831 b1dust-proof condition at all times. 2    Section 100. Sanitary, electrical, and safety appliances. 3The management of every tiny home park shall assume full 4responsibility for maintaining in good repair and condition 5all sanitary, electrical, and safety appliances in the tiny 6home park, and shall promptly bring an action as is necessary 7to prosecute or eject from the tiny home park any person who 8willfully or maliciously damages the appliances or any person 9who fails to comply with this Act or the rules adopted under 10this Act. 11    Section 105. Electrical outlets. Electrical outlets for 12each individual site shall be provided, and the installation 13of those outlets shall be in accordance with all State or local 14codes and ordinances. 15    Section 110. Fire safety. All private water supply systems 16and hydrants for fire safety purposes shall be maintained in 17operable condition and good repair as defined by the State 18Fire Marshal or tiny home park licensing agency. A tiny home 19park that does not have a private water supply system and 20hydrants shall have an agreement, approved by the State Fire 21Marshal or licensing agency in consultation with the municipal 22fire department or the local fire protection district, to 23provide an adequate and reliable water supply for fire   HB2411- 13 -LRB104 09765 LNS 19831 b1mitigation needs. This agreement shall be signed and dated by 2the tiny home park operator and the local fire chief. 3Certification that this agreement exists shall be signed by 4the tiny home park operator and the local fire chief, and 5submitted with each application for original licensure or 6licensure renewal required under Section 30. A copy of this 7agreement shall be on file at the local fire department or fire 8protection district and posted in public view at the tiny home 9park site by the tiny home park operator, and shall be 10available for inspection.11    The municipal fire department or fire protection district 12that has jurisdictional responsibility for responding to a 13fire call in a tiny home park shall annually inspect the tiny 14home park in accordance with the applicable tiny home park 15fire protection standards. If, upon inspection, the municipal 16fire department or fire protection district finds that a tiny 17home park does not meet the applicable fire protection 18standards, the municipal fire department or fire protection 19district shall give, within 5 working days of the inspection, 20a written notice of violation to the tiny home park operator 21and to the Department of Public Health describing any 22violation or required modification or repair. The tiny home 23park operator has 30 days after receipt of the written notice 24to correct the violation or make the required modification or 25repair. Not less than 30 days after the tiny home park 26operator's receipt of the notice, the municipal fire   HB2411- 14 -LRB104 09765 LNS 19831 b1department or fire protection district shall reinspect the 2tiny home park and issue a written reinspection report to the 3tiny home park operator and to the Department of Public Health 4concerning the status of the tiny home park operator's 5compliance with the notice and whether any violation still 6exists. If the municipal fire department or fire protection 7district determines on reinspection that a tiny home park 8operator has made a good faith and substantial effort to 9comply with the notice but that compliance is not complete, 10the municipal fire department or fire protection district may 11grant the tiny home park operator an extension of time for 12compliance, as it deems fit, by a written notice of extension 13of time for compliance issued within 5 working days after the 14reinspection that identifies what remains to be corrected, 15modified, or repaired and provides a date by which compliance 16must be achieved. If an extension is granted, the municipal 17fire department or fire protection district shall make another 18inspection within 10 days after the date set for compliance 19and issue a final written report to the tiny home park operator 20and the Department of Public Health concerning the status of 21the tiny home park operator's compliance with the notice, 22written report, and written notice of extension of time for 23compliance and whether a violation still exists. If a tiny 24home park operator fails to cure the violation or comply with 25the requirements stated in the notice of violation, or if a 26written notice of extension of time for compliance is issued   HB2411- 15 -LRB104 09765 LNS 19831 b1and the final written report states that a violation still 2exists, the municipal fire department or fire protection 3district shall notify the Department of Public Health of the 4tiny home park operator's failure to comply with the notice of 5violation and the written report and shall deliver to the 6Authority for purposes of enforcement under this Section 7copies of all written notices and reports concerning the 8violation.9    Upon receipt of the written reports concerning the 10violation, the Authority shall issue to the tiny home park 11operator a notice of intent to assess civil penalties in the 12amount of $500 per day, per violation for noncompliance with 13the written notice of violation issued by the municipal fire 14department or fire protection district and shall provide the 15tiny home park operator with the opportunity for an 16administrative hearing under Section 145.17    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, the 18enforcement of home rule ordinances and regulations shall be 19by the appropriate local authorities, including local public 20health departments, municipal attorneys, and State's 21Attorneys. A home rule unit may not regulate the legal rights, 22remedies, and obligations of a tiny home park operator under 23this Section in a manner less restrictive than the regulation 24by the State of fire safety in a tiny home park under this 25Section. This Section is a limitation under subsection (i) of 26Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on the   HB2411- 16 -LRB104 09765 LNS 19831 b1concurrent exercise by home rule units of powers and function 2exercised by the State. 3    Section 115. Condition of supplied facilities and 4equipment. If community kitchens, dining rooms, laundries, or 5other facilities are provided, the facilities and equipment 6supplied must be maintained in a sanitary condition and kept 7in good repair, and subject to the rules adopted by the 8Authority. 9    Section 120. Retention of originals; notification to 10municipalities; forms for permits. If the Authority has 11approved an application for a permit to construct a tiny home 12park or appurtenances to a tiny home park or a license to 13maintain and operate a tiny home park, it shall retain the 14original and keep a file containing the application. The 15Authority shall notify the clerk of the municipality if the 16tiny home park is located within the limits of a municipality 17or the county clerk if the tiny home park is located outside 18the limits of a municipality of all approved applications for 19construction of tiny home parks or expansion of licensed tiny 20home parks.21    The Authority shall draft and supply all forms and blanks 22and specify the number and detail necessary to obtain permits 23to construct or make alterations upon tiny home parks, and for 24a license to maintain and operate a tiny home park according to   HB2411- 17 -LRB104 09765 LNS 19831 b1this Act. 2    Section 125. Records. The Authority shall keep a record of 3all tiny home parks. The records shall show the names and 4addresses of all tiny home parks, the names and addresses of 5the licensees, the number of tiny homes in each tiny home park, 6the source of water supply for the tiny home park, the system 7of sewage and garbage disposal for the tiny home park, and any 8other information desired by the Authority.9    The Authority shall supply licensees of all tiny home 10parks with the health rules that pertain to the tiny home park 11and that have been adopted by the Authority, and any 12amendments that may be made from time to time to those rules. 13The rules shall be posted by the management of the tiny home 14park in a protected, conspicuous place within the tiny home 15park. 16    Section 130. Licensure by county or municipality. In 17addition to the license required under Section 15, any county 18or municipality in this State may provide for the licensing of 19a tiny home park within its corporate limits; however, the 20license shall not serve to exempt the tiny home park from the 21license and fee required under Section 15, and the county or 22municipality shall not charge a fee greater than $500 per 23calendar year for the municipal or county license.   HB2411- 18 -LRB104 09765 LNS 19831 b1    Section 135. Enforcement. The Authority shall enforce the 2provisions of this Act and the rules adopted under this Act 3affecting health, sanitation, water supply, sewage, garbage, 4fire safety, and waste disposal, and the Authority shall 5inspect, at least once each year, each tiny home park and all 6its accommodations and facilities. The officials or officers 7are granted the power and authority to enter upon the premises 8of tiny home parks at any time for the purposes set forth in 9this Act.10    The Authority may issue rules to carry out the provisions 11of this Act. The rules may contain provisions for the 12Authority to grant a waiver to a tiny home park, if the intent 13and purpose of the Act are met.14    The Authority is empowered to assess civil penalties for 15violations of Section 110. Civil penalties in the amount of 16$500 per day, per violation shall be assessed for 17noncompliance with the written notice of violation issued by a 18municipal fire department or fire protection district. An 19additional civil penalty of $500 per day of violation shall be 20assessed against a tiny home park operator who knowingly rents 21or offers for rent a tiny home or tiny home site without taking 22appropriate corrective action to remedy a notice of violation 23issued by a municipal fire department or fire protection 24district. The first day of violation for purposes of assessing 25a fine shall be the date of the tiny home park operator's 26receipt of the written report following the reinspection, if   HB2411- 19 -LRB104 09765 LNS 19831 b1the written report states that a violation still exists. If a 2written notice of extension of time for compliance is issued 3and the final written report states that a violation still 4exists, the first day of violation for purposes of assessing a 5fine shall be the date of the tiny home park operator's receipt 6of the final written report. The Authority shall deposit all 7fees and fines collected under this Act into the Facility 8Licensing Fund. Moneys in the Fund, subject to appropriation, 9shall be used for the enforcement of this Act.10    In the administration and enforcement of this Act, the 11Authority may designate and use full-time city or county 12health departments as its agents in making inspections and 13investigations. 14    Section 140. Hearing. Any person refused a permit to 15construct or a license or any person whose license is 16suspended or revoked shall have the right to a hearing before 17the Authority. A written notice of a request for a hearing 18shall be served upon the Authority within 20 days of the 19refusal of a permit to construct or alter, the refusal of a 20license, or the suspension or revocation of a license. The 21Director shall give written notice of the decision, by 22registered mail, to the tiny home park operator or the 23applicant within 5 days of the refusal, suspension, or 24revocation.25    The hearing shall be conducted by the Director or a duly   HB2411- 20 -LRB104 09765 LNS 19831 b1qualified employee of the Authority designated in writing by 2the Director as a hearing officer.3    The Director or hearing officer may compel by subpoena or 4subpoena duces tecum the attendance and testimony of witnesses 5and the production of books and papers, and administer oaths 6to witnesses. The hearing shall be conducted at a place as 7designated by the Authority. The Director shall give written 8notice of the time and place of hearing, by registered mail, to 9the tiny home park operator or license applicant at least 10 10days before the hearing.11    The Director or hearing officer shall permit the tiny home 12park operator or applicant to appear in person and to be 13represented by counsel at the hearing at which time the tiny 14home park operator or applicant shall be afforded an 15opportunity to present all relevant matter in support of the 16application for license or renewal of license or in resisting 17the revocation of a license.18    If any party or the Authority is unable to procure the 19attendance of witnesses to give testimony or produce books and 20papers, a party or the Authority may take the deposition of 21witnesses in accordance with the law pertaining to the taking 22of depositions in civil cases in the circuit courts of this 23State. All testimony taken at a hearing shall be reduced to 24writing, and all testimony and other evidence introduced at 25the hearing shall constitute a part of the record of the 26hearing.  HB2411- 21 -LRB104 09765 LNS 19831 b1    The Director shall make findings of fact in the hearing, 2and the Director shall render a decision within 30 days after 3the termination of the hearing, unless additional time is 4required by the Director for a proper disposition of the 5matter. When the hearing has been conducted by a hearing 6officer, the Director shall review the record before rendering 7a decision. It shall be the duty of the Director to forward a 8copy of the decision, by registered mail, to the tiny home park 9operator or applicant within 5 days of rendering the decision.10    Technical errors in the proceeding before the Director or 11hearing officer or the failure of the Director or hearing 12officer to observe the technical rules of evidence shall not 13constitute grounds for the reversal of any administrative 14decision unless it appears to the court that the error or 15failure materially affects the rights of any party and results 16in substantial injustice to the party.17    All subpoenas issued by the Director or hearing officer 18may be served as provided for in civil actions. The fees of 19witnesses for attendance and travel shall be the same as the 20fees for witnesses before the circuit court and shall be paid 21by the party to a proceeding at whose request the subpoena is 22issued. If a subpoena is issued at the request of the 23Authority, the witness fee shall be paid as an administrative 24expense.25    In cases of refusal of a witness to attend or testify, or 26to produce books or papers, concerning any matter upon which   HB2411- 22 -LRB104 09765 LNS 19831 b1the witness might be lawfully examined, the circuit court of 2the county where the hearing is held, upon application of any 3party to the proceeding, may compel obedience by proceeding 4for contempt as in cases of a like refusal to obey a similar 5order of the court.6    The Authority shall not be required to certify any record 7or file any answer or otherwise appear in any proceeding for 8judicial review unless the party filing the complaint deposits 9with the clerk of the court the sum of $0.95 per page 10representing costs of the certification. Failure on the part 11of the plaintiff to make the deposit shall be grounds for 12dismissal of the action. 13    Section 145. Illinois Administrative Procedure Act. The 14provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act are 15hereby expressly adopted and shall apply to all administrative 16rules and procedures of the Department of Public Health under 17this Act, except that in case of conflict between the Illinois 18Administrative Procedure Act and this Act the provisions of 19this Act shall control, and except that Section 5-35 of the 20Illinois Administrative Procedure Act relating to procedures 21for rulemaking does not apply to the adoption of any rule 22required by federal law in connection with which the Authority 23is precluded by law from exercising any discretion. 24    Section 150. Administrative Review Law. The Administrative   HB2411- 23 -LRB104 09765 LNS 19831 b1Review Law and the rules adopted pursuant to the 2Administrative Review Law shall apply to and govern all 3proceedings for judicial review of final administrative 4decisions of the Authority under this Act. 5    Section 155. Validity. If any one or more of the 6provisions of this Act is declared unconstitutional or the 7application thereof is held invalid, the validity of the 8remainder of the Act and the application of the provisions to 9other persons and circumstances shall not be affected thereby.